Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-816
Vacant Building and Excess Land Cash Fund; created; use; investment; restrictions.

(1) The Vacant Building and Excess Land Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of proceeds credited to the fund pursuant to section 72-815. The fund shall be used to pay for the maintenance of vacant state buildings and excess state land and for expenses related to the disposal of state buildings and land referred to the department pursuant to sections 72-811 to 72-818. The fund shall be administered by the state building division of the department. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Funds may be transferred from the Vacant Building and Excess Land Cash Fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

(2) If there are insufficient funds in the fund to enable the division to fully implement the orders issued pursuant to sections 72-811 to 72-818, the division shall implement them in the order which most efficiently meets the purposes of such sections.

(3) Funds appropriated to the Task Force for Building Renewal shall not be used to carry out any of the purposes of such sections (a) unless the building would otherwise qualify for the use of such funds pursuant to the Deferred Building Renewal Act and (b) except for any expenses incurred by the administrator of the Task Force for Building Renewal in fulfilling his or her duties under such sections.

Laws 1988, LB 1143, § 6;

Laws 1990, LB 830, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 11;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 73;

Laws 1995, LB 567, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 873, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 22;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 403, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 426, § 13;

Laws 2006, LB 1061, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB716, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 38.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB716, section 2, with LB905, section 38, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB716 became effective July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB905 became operative July 1, 2026.>
Deferred Building Renewal Act, see section 81-190.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.